external/rhvoice/src/scripts/Spanish/pg2p.foma
# Sobre object. There are three subcases for this word. The one is the "under" attribution, the second is the paper object, and the third is action (acción de sobrar).
sobreObject -> || 
[MaleObjectPronoun|PersonalObjectPronoun|[k a1 dh a0]] %# _ WB , 
[k w a0 n d o0] %# _ WB , # Example: cuando sobre la comida, haré el recalentado.
WB _ %# [k o0 n] %# PhWord ,, 

# Also, we will stress demonstratives for es. For example: esta es, este es, ese es, esa es.
esDemonstrative -> || 
WB _ %# singularAction WB , 
WB _ %# [p w e1 dh [e0|a0]] WB , 
WB [s i0 n %# k e0 %#] _ %# PhWord IVrbS WB ,, 

# And we will apply the same for "son". Example: estas son las bufandas que Mateo tegió.
sonDemonstrative -> || 
WB _ %# pluralAction WB , 
WB _ %# [p w e1 dh [e0|a0] n] WB , 
WB [s i0 n %# k e0 %#] _ %# PhWord IVrbP WB ,, 

# Rules for para, which can be used in two contexts: "stop" action (parar) and "to" preposition (para)
# Example: se me "pára" el corazón, no "pára" de llover > esto es para ti.
[p a0 r a0]:[p a1 r a0] -> || 
WB [s e0] (%# PersonalReflexivePronoun) %# _ , 
WB [n o1] %# _ %# [dh e0] %# PhWord ,, 

# And these rules for the "eat" verb:
comer -> || 
WB [firstPerson|condition] %# _ WB , WB [k e0 %# m e0 %#] _ WB ,, 

# Let's create another context. Since "una" is unstressed in g2p, we need to stress it when the word "cada" is found before. For example, "él repartió cada una de las galletas". The strength of the vowel is in the una (cada úna).
[u0 n a0]:[u1 n a0] -> || 
WB [k a1 dh a0] %# _ , 
%# [[l|m|s] e0] %# _ WB , 
WB _ %# [[d|dh] e0] ,, 
# SAPM for "unas", example: cuando te unas a la llamada.
[u0 n a0 s]:[u1 n a0 s] -> || %# [[[l|m|t] e0]|[n o0 s]] %# _ WB ,, 
# SAPM for "unos", example: unos a otros
[u0 n o0 s]:[u1 n o0 s] -> || WB _ %# [a0|i0|u0] %# PhWord ,, 
# Stressing context for "hace". Hace is the action of "hacer" (make), however it also reffers to an action happened in the past. "ella ya no está desde hace un tiempo"
MakeTag:[a0 c e0] -> || 
# General basis.
WB [d e0 s d e0] %# _ %# PhWord , 
WB _ %# [[m i1 l e0 s]|[m i0 ll o1 n e0 s]] %# PhWord , 
# Gender-independent:
WB _ %# HaceFemeninoSingular %# HaceFemeninoSingularAction WB , 
WB _ %# HaceFemeninoPlural %# HaceFemeninoPluralAction WB , 
WB _ %# HaceMasculinoSingular %# HaceMasculinoSingularAction WB , 
WB _ %# HaceMasculinoPlural %# [HaceMasculinoPluralAction|HaceMasculinoPluralActionNumber] WB , 
# Number independend:
WB _ %# PhoneticedNumber %# [HaceFemeninoPluralAction|HaceMasculinoPluralActionNumber] WB ,, 
# Create stressing context for "nuestro" (s), example: lo nuestro ya no puede continuar, este es uno de los nuestros.
[n w e0 s t r o0]:[n w e1 s t r o0] -> || WB [l o0] %# _ WB ,, 
[n w e0 s t r o0 s]:[n w e1 s t r o0 s] -> || WB [l o0 s] %# _ WB ,, 
# Stress "cuando", example: "de vez en cuando"
[k w a0 n d o0]:[k w a1 n d o0] -> || WB [bh e1 c %# e0 n %#] _ WB ,, 
# Unstress frente (example: frente a una copa de vino, frente al mar)
[f r e1 n t e0]:[f r e0 n t e0] -> || WB _ %# [a0 (l)] %# PhWord ,, 
# Context stress for "entre": we have the preposition (between) and the verb (entrar)
[e0 n t r e0]:[e1 n t r e0] -> || WB k e0 (%# PersonalReflexivePronoun) %# _ WB ,, 
# Context stress for "durante": time reference narration VS. Simple present tense.
# Example: antes, durante y después.
[d|dh] [u0 r a0 n t e0]:[u0 r a1 n t e0] -> 
|| WB _ %# i0 %# PhWord ,, 
# SAPM for "mediante": "mediante" is the connector for "through", but it isn't used as connector in a special religious case.
[m e0 dh j a0 n t e0]:[m e0 dh j a1 n t e0] -> || WB [d j o1 s] %# _ WB ,, 
# And create stressing context for "haya". "Haya" can be used in two contexts. The one is the verb called "hacer" (espero que hayas hecho la tarea), default in g2p, and the other is from the verb "haber" (cuando haya plata, que haya paz en la tierra) which we are going to make here.
[a0 y a0]:[a1 y a0] -> || 
WB [k w a0 n d o0] %# _ WB , 
WB _ %# [[l a0]|[p a1 c]] WB , 
WB _ %# [n a1 dh a0] WB ; 

define untag 
MakeTag @-> [a1 c e0] || _ ,, 
[IVrbS|IVrbP] @-> 0 || _ ; 

define untag2 
TagYgriega @-> i0 ; 

regex 
SpanishStressPost .o. 
PhonemeToSpelling .o. 
untag2 .o. 
ConnectorExceptions .o. 
Unstress2 .o. 
RemainingApproximants .o. 
PreUnstressNumber .o. 
unstressNumber .o. 
HomonymousWords .o. 
untag ; 
